Utah statutes.
53-8-202.   Definitions.

(1)  The definitions in Section 41-6a-102 apply to this part.

(2)  As used in this part, "council" means the Motor Vehicle Safety Inspection Advisory Council created in Section 53-8-203.



Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

